District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

50-1301.33

Matters not to be evidence in civil suits.

Repealed.

May 25, 1954, 68 Stat. 129, ch. 222, § 33
Sept. 18, 1982, D.C. Law 4-155,§ 14(e), 29 DCR 3491
1981 Ed., § 40-433.
1973 Ed., § 40-449.